Mississippi, session 2026, SB2816.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MISSISSIPPI: SECTION 1.  Section 99-19-301, Mississippi Code of 1972, is amended as follows: 99-19-301.  (1)  The penalty for any felony or misdemeanor shall be subject to enhancement as provided in Sections 99-19-301 through 99-19-307 if the felony or misdemeanor was committed because of the actual or perceived race, color, ancestry, ethnicity, religion, national origin or gender of the victim. (2)  The penalty for any felony or misdemeanor shall be subject to enhancement as provided in Sections 99-19-301 through 99-19-307 if the felony or misdemeanor was committed with the specific intent to target an individual or group because of actual or perceived employment as a law enforcement officer, firefighter * * * or, emergency medical technician or the Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services employee. (3)  As used in Sections 99-19-301 through 99-19-307: (a)  "Law enforcement officer" means any law enforcement officer, part-time law enforcement officer or law enforcement trainee as defined in Section 45-6-3, as well as any reserve or volunteer law enforcement officer and any federal law enforcement officer or employee whose permanent duties include making arrests, performing search and seizures, execution of criminal arrest warrants, execution of civil seizure warrants, or the care, custody, control or supervision of inmates. (b) "Firefighter" means any firefighter regularly employed by a fire department of any municipality, county, or fire protection district of the State of Mississippi and includes a volunteer firefighter. (c)  "Emergency medical technician" means a person qualified under Sections 41-59-33 and 41-59-35. (d) "Mississippi Department of Child Protection Services Employee" means any person employed by MDCPS. SECTION 2.  This act shall take effect and be in force from and after July 1, 2026.